Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.234

Determination of prosecuting authority if defendant charged by attorney general and prosecuting attorney.

If both a prosecuting attorney and the attorney general file an information or indictment charging a defendant with substantially the same offense(s), the court shall, upon motion of either the prosecuting attorney or the attorney general:

(1) Determine whose prosecution of the case will best promote the interests of justice and enter an order designating that person as the prosecuting authority in the case; and

(2) Enter an order dismissing the information or indictment filed by the person who was not designated the prosecuting authority.

[ 1981 c 335 s 3.]